Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-604
Ordinances; resolutions; regulations; force and effect.

All valid ordinances, resolutions, orders or other regulations of a city, or any authorized body or official thereof, existing at the time sections 19-601 to 19-648 become applicable to the city, and not inconsistent with their provisions, shall continue in full force and effect until amended, repealed or otherwise superseded.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 4, p. 498;

C.S.1922, § 4541;

C.S.1929, § 19-604;

R.S.1943, § 19-604.